District of Columbia statutes.
7-126

Executive committee.

There is established an executive committee, which shall:

(1)

Be part of the Mayor’s Council;

(2)

Advise the Mayor’s Council;

(3)

Be led by the chairperson designated pursuant to § 7-121(b)(2);

(4)

Be comprised of not more than 10 members of the Mayor’s Council; provided, that at least 3 members are members appointed by the Council, pursuant to § 7-121(b)(3)(A)(i), and 3 members are members appointed by the Mayor, pursuant to § 7-121(b)(3)(A)(ii); and

(5)

Meet no fewer than 4 times per year, and at least one time each quarter of the year.

History

Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-58, § 7, 58 DCR 8969

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-121.